Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.205

Physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician and paramedic—Certification.

(1) The secretary of the department of health shall prescribe:

(a) Practice parameters, training standards for, and levels of, physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics;

(b) Minimum standards and performance requirements for the certification and recertification of physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics; and

(c) Procedures for provisional certification, certification, recertification, and decertification of physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics.

(2) Initial certification shall be for a period established by the secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(3) Recertification shall be granted upon proof of continuing satisfactory performance and education, and shall be for a period established by the secretary pursuant to RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(4) As used in this chapter and chapter 18.73 RCW, "approved medical program director" means a person who:

(a) Is licensed to practice medicine and surgery pursuant to this chapter or osteopathic medicine and surgery pursuant to chapter 18.57 RCW; and

(b) Is qualified and knowledgeable in the administration and management of emergency care and services; and

(c) Is so certified by the department of health for a county, group of counties, or cities with populations over four hundred thousand in coordination with the recommendations of the local medical community and local emergency medical services and trauma care council.

(5) The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of certificates, and the disciplining of certificate holders under this section. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this section. Disciplinary action shall be initiated against a person credentialed under this chapter in a manner consistent with the responsibilities and duties of the medical program director under whom such person is responsible.

(6) Such activities of physician's trained advanced emergency medical technicians and paramedics shall be limited to actions taken under the express written or oral order of medical program directors and shall not be construed at any time to include freestanding or nondirected actions, for actions not presenting an emergency or life-threatening condition, except nonemergency activities performed pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

(7) Nothing in this section prohibits a physician's trained advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic, acting under the responsible supervision and direction of an approved medical program director, from participating in a community assistance referral and education services program established under RCW 35.21.930 if such participation does not exceed the participant's training and certification.

[ 2022 c 136 s 4; 2015 c 93 s 3; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 24. Prior: 1996 c 191 s 55; 1996 c 178 s 6; 1995 c 65 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 316; 1992 c 128 s 1; 1990 c 269 s 18; 1986 c 68 s 1; 1983 c 112 s 2; 1977 c 55 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.